Oklahoma, session 2026, SB679.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be


codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:


This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Property Tax


Transparency Act”.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be


codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:

Req. No. 1354 Page 1


The purpose of this act is to ensure full transparency in


property tax assessments and billing by mandating detailed reporting


of:


1. Fair cash value with the methodology used for determination;


2. Assessment ratios;


3. Exemptions;


4. Property taxes; and


5. A breakdown of how property tax revenues are allocated and


spent.


The act further requires that a copy of the property tax bill is


sent directly to property owners, even if the property is in escrow


and the bank is responsible for payment.


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2802.3 of Title 68, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this act:


1. “Fair cash value” means the estimated market value of a


property as determined by the county tax assessor using standardized


methodologies pursuant to Section 2817 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


2. “Assessment ratio” means the percentage of the fair cash


value that is subject to taxation, as established by state law or


local regulations pursuant to Section 8 of Article X of the Oklahoma


Constitution;

Req. No. 1354 Page 2


3. “Exemptions” means reductions in taxable value granted based


on eligibility criteria including, but not limited to, age, income,


and property use;


4. “Property tax bill” means a document detailing the property


taxes owed, including how the total was calculated, and sent to the


property owner; and


5. “Escrow” means a financial arrangement where a third party


holds funds on behalf of property owners to pay property taxes and


other obligations.


B. County tax assessors shall include in the annual assessment


statement:


1. The fair cash value of the property; and


2. A detailed explanation of the methodology used to determine


the fair cash value, including:


a. comparable sales data, including addresses and sale


prices of similar properties,


b. adjustments made for property-specific factors such as


size, age, condition, and location, and


c. any other considerations affecting valuation, such as


zoning changes, recent improvements, or market trends.


C. The assessment ratio applied to calculate the taxable value


of the property shall be clearly stated, along with a citation to


the legal authority setting the ratio.



Req. No. 1354 Page 3


D. A detailed list of all exemptions or abatements applied must


be provided, including:


a. the type of exemption,


b. the dollar value of each exemption, and


c. the basis or criteria for eligibility.


E. The total property taxes owed shall be calculated and


presented, with a clear breakdown showing:


1. The taxable value of the property after applying the


assessment ratio and exemptions;


2. The tax rates for each taxing entity including, but not


limited to, schools, municipalities, special districts; and


3. The dollar amount allocated to each taxing entity.


F. Each property tax bill shall include a breakdown of how the


tax contributions of the owner are spent, expressed as a percentage


of the total taxes collected. The breakdown shall include


categories such as:


1. Public education;


2. Public safety, including, but not limited to, police


departments, fire departments, and emergency services;


3. Infrastructure and transportation;


4. Administrative and operational costs;


5. Debt servicing; and


6. Any other significant expenditure categories specific to the


taxing entities.

Req. No. 1354 Page 4


G. Taxing entities receiving property tax revenues shall


provide detailed annual expenditure reports to the county tax


assessor, ensuring accurate and up-to-date allocation data for


inclusion in property tax bills.


H. A copy of the property tax bill shall be sent directly to


the mailing address of the property owner, regardless of whether the


property is in escrow or the bank is responsible for payment with


designation if the property tax is paid via escrow or not. If a


property tax bill is sent to an escrow holder, it shall include a


statement that a copy of the bill has also been sent to the property


owner.


I. Property owners shall have the right to access and review


all records and data used in determining the fair cash value of


their property.


J. Property owners may formally contest the fair cash value of


their property by requesting a review, during which the county tax


assessor must provide justification and supporting documentation for


the valuation.


K. County tax assessors shall maintain an online platform where


property owners can access their assessment, fair cash value


determination, assessment ratio, exemptions, and tax liability. The


platform shall include a searchable database allowing property


owners to locate detailed information about their property and


download relevant reports.

Req. No. 1354 Page 5


L. Independent third-party audits shall be conducted annually


to verify the accuracy and fairness of property tax assessments and


billing processes. Audit findings must be published on the online


platform of the county within thirty (30) days of completion.


M. The enforcement of this act shall be the responsibility of


the State Auditor and Inspector, in collaboration with the relevant


county authorities. The State Auditor and Inspector shall oversee


compliance with the reporting and transparency requirements. County


governments shall assist by identifying and reporting violations at


the local level.


N. Failure to provide a copy of the property tax bill to


property owners shall result in a fine not to exceed One Thousand


Dollars ($1,000.00) per violation. Fines shall be collected by the


State Treasurer and shall be allocated as follows:


1. Fifty percent (50%) to the State Auditor and Inspector;


2. Twenty-five percent (25%) to the county fund of the county


where the violation occurred; and


3. Twenty-five percent (25%) to the municipality where the


violation occurred. If the violation did not occur in a


municipality, then the portion provided by this paragraph shall be


allocated to the county fund of the county where the violation


occurred.


O. Knowingly providing inaccurate information in property


assessments, tax bills, or expenditure breakdowns shall be treated

Req. No. 1354 Page 6


as a misdemeanor punishable under applicable state laws. Fines for


false or misleading reporting shall be collected by the State


Treasurer and distributed using the same allocation percentages


provided in subsection N of this section.


P. The State Auditor and Inspector shall prepare an annual


report detailing:


1. The number and nature of violations;


2. Total fines collected and their allocation; and


3. Recommendations for improving enforcement and compliance


with this act.


SECTION 4. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 5. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-1354 QD 1/19/2025 5:41:13 AM















Req. No. 1354 Page 7